sms/test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-joorbas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - luäǯ'ǯ class A1a: # Adjective 'loose' - full paradigm
#    luäǯ'ǯ+A+Pred+Sg: luäǯ'ǯ
    luäǯ'ǯ+A+Pred+Pl: luäǯǯ
    luäǯ'ǯ+A+Attr: luäǯǯas
    luäǯ'ǯ+A+Comp: luäǯǯab
    luäǯ'ǯ+A+Superl: luäǯǯmõs

  Adjective - čueʹǩǩ class A1e: # Adjective 'shallow' - full paradigm
#    čueʹǩǩ+A+Pred+Sg: čueʹǩǩ
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Pred+Pl: čueʹjj
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Attr: čueʹjjes
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Comp: čueʹjjab
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Superl: čueʹjjmõs

  Adjective - kuʹǩǩ class A1e: # Adjective 'long' - full paradigm
#    kuʹǩǩ+A+Pred+Sg: kuʹǩǩ
    kuʹǩǩ+A+Pred+Pl: kuʹǩ
    kuʹǩǩ+A+Attr: kuʹǩes
    kuʹǩǩ+A+Comp: kuʹǩab
    kuʹǩǩ+A+Superl: kuʹǩmõs

  Adjective - neuʹrr class A1e: # Adjective 'bad' - full paradigm
#    neuʹrr+A+Pred+Sg: neuʹrr
    neuʹrr+A+Pred+Pl: neeuʹr
    neuʹrr+A+Attr: neeuʹres
    neuʹrr+A+Comp: neeuʹrab
    neuʹrr+A+Superl: neeuʹrmõs

  Adjective - čââvas class A4a: # Adjective 'durable' - full paradigm
#    čââvas+A+Pred+Sg: čââvas
#    čââvas+A+Pred+Pl: čââvas
    čââvas+A+Attr: čââpp
    čââvas+A+Comp: čââppsab
    čââvas+A+Superl: čââppsumus

  Adjective - kõõumâs class A4â: # Adjective 'hard' - full paradigm
#    kõõumâs+A+Pred+Sg: kõõumâs
#    kõõumâs+A+Pred+Pl: kõõumâs
    kõõumâs+A+Attr: kõumm
#    kõõumâs+A+Comp: kõummsab
#    kõõumâs+A+Superl: kõummsumus
    
  Adjective - jõõskâs class A4â: # Adjective 'quiet' - full paradigm
#    jõõskâs+A+Pred+Sg: jõõskâs
#    jõõskâs+A+Pred+Pl: jõõskâs
    jõõskâs+A+Attr: jõskk
    jõõskâs+A+Comp: jõskksab
    jõõskâs+A+Superl: jõskksumus

  Adjective - joorbâs class A4â: # Adjective 'round' - full paradigm
#    joorbâs+A+Pred+Sg: joorbâs
    joorbâs+A+Attr: jorbb

  Adjective - tiiudâs class A4â: # Adjective 'full' - full paradigm
#    tiiudâs+A+Pred+Sg: tiiudâs
    tiiudâs+A+Attr: tiudd

  Adjective - vuäʹmes class A4e: # Adjective 'old' - full paradigm
#    vuäʹmes+A+Pred+Sg: vuäʹm
#    vuäʹmes+A+Pred+Pl: vuäʹmes
    vuäʹmes+A+Attr: vuäʹmm
#    vuäʹmes+A+Comp: vuämmsab
#    vuäʹmes+A+Superl: vuämmsumus
